Mississippi, session 2026, SB2601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is hereby created a technical institute by the name of the "Mississippi Natural Hair Care School" to have perpetual succession, with power to contract and be contracted with, to receive by any legal method of transfer or conveyance, property of any description, to have, hold and employ the same, to make and use a corporate seal, with power to break or change the same, and to adopt bylaws, rules and regulations for the government of its members, official agents and employees. (2)  The school shall be governed by the State Board of Education. (3)  The Board of Education shall develop a plan relating to the opening, operation, and funding of the school.  Such plan shall be presented to the Legislature during the 2027 Regular Session. (4)  The object of the Mississippi Natural Hair Care School shall be to provide instruction to students in styling natural hair and to provide instruction and training in other such subjects as the State Board of Education may, from time to time, prescribe.  It shall also be the object of said school to establish and conduct classes or courses for preparing, equipping and training citizens of the State of Mississippi for employment in gainful occupations, in trade and in industrial and distributive pursuits concerning natural hair whether such students are qualified by educational requirements or not. (5)  The Mississippi Natural Hair Care School shall be located in Greenville, Mississippi. (6)  The president of the Mississippi Natural Hair Care School shall be held as the professional adviser of the State Board of Education of all matters pertaining to the inside arrangements of buildings, selection of faculty and course of study.  He or she shall have the immediate supervision and management of said college in all its departments, subject, however, to the general supervision, management and direction of the State Board of Education. (7)  The Board of Education shall prepare the annual budget for the school. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.